Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 231 Places of Entertainment

231.010.
Place of entertainment defined.

As used in this chapter, “place of entertainment” means a roadhouse, place offering intoxicating or nonintoxicating drinks for sale, tourist camp or place of public entertainment at which people assemble to eat, drink, dance, bathe, or engage in any game or amusement, or any place having therein or thereon any person engaging in the practice of being a medium, clairvoyant, soothsayer, palmist, phrenologist, spiritualist, or like activity, or one who, with or without the use of cards, crystal ball, tea leaves, or any other object or device, engages in the practice of telling the fortune of another; but this last clause shall not be construed to apply to persons pretending to tell fortunes as part of any play, exhibition, fair or amateur show presented or offered by any religious, charitable, or benevolent institution. It shall not mean a private home at which bona fide guests are entertained, drive-in theaters, places of business conducted only as filling stations for motor vehicles or grocery stores, nor transient or temporary entertainment such as circuses, carnivals and county fairs.

History.

1599f-1, 1599f-14: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 175, § 1.

231.020.
Permit to operate required.

No place of entertainment shall be operated outside the corporate limits of a city unless its owner or manager has a permit, issued to him by the county judge/executive in the county in which the place of entertainment is located, granting to him the privilege to operate the place of entertainment in that county.

History.

1599f-1, 1599f-11: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 361, effective June 17, 1978.

231.030.
What persons not to be granted permits.

No permit shall be issued to a person who is not of good moral character or who will not, in the judgment of the court, obey the laws of the state in the carrying on of the business or who within two (2) years prior to the date of the filing of the application has been convicted in Kentucky of maintaining a public nuisance.

History.

1599f-5.

231.040.
Application for permit.

Any person who desires a permit to operate a place of entertainment outside the corporate limits of a city shall file an application with the county clerk. The application shall set forth the true name of the owner of the place of entertainment, the exact location of the proposed place of entertainment and the occupation of the owner or manager of the proposed place of entertainment for five (5) years immediately preceding the date on which the application is filed.

History.

1599f-2.

231.050.
Deposit of applicant — Disposition of deposit.

At the time the application is filed, the applicant shall deposit twenty dollars ($20) with the county clerk which shall be used by the clerk to defray the cost of the notices required by KRS

231.060

to be published in a newspaper, to pay the clerk’s cost for the docketing of the application on the order book of the county judge/executive and for recording such orders of the county judge/executive as may be entered therein. Fifteen dollars ($15) of the deposit shall be used for advertising and five dollars ($5) shall be paid to the clerk as his fee.

History.

1599f-6: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 362, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

231.060.
County clerk to docket and publish application.

When the application is filed with the county clerk he shall have a notice that the application has been filed, published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 in the county.

History.

1599f-3: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 172; 1978, ch. 384, § 363, effective June 17, 1978.

231.070.
County attorney to investigate applicant.

The county attorney, after an application has been filed, shall investigate the applicant and file with the county judge/executive a written report setting forth the facts revealed by his investigation, recommending the granting or the denial of the permit. The report shall be filed with the county clerk within thirty (30) days after the application is filed.

History.

1599f-7: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 364, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An entertainment permit, once granted to a particular individual under this chapter, cannot be transferred to a new owner or manager of the place of entertainment.

OAG 80-429

.

231.080.
Hearing for or against granting of permit.

After the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date on which the application is filed, the county judge/executive shall hear evidence in support of or in opposition to the granting of the permit. Any person desiring to oppose the permit shall have filed in writing allegations that show cause as to why the application should not be granted.

History.

1599f-4: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 365, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An entertainment permit, once granted to a particular individual under this chapter, cannot be transferred to a new owner or manager of the place of entertainment.

OAG 80-429

.

231.090.
Appeal from decision denying or granting permit.

From the decision of the county judge/executive refusing to grant the permit, the applicant may appeal to the Circuit Court, where the appeal shall be tried as an action in equity, and the evidence shall be heard in open court.

From the decision of the county judge/executive granting a permit, any citizen of the county may appeal to the Circuit Court and the appeal in the Circuit Court shall be tried as in the case of an appeal from a judgment denying the permit.

Before any appeal is perfected, the party appealing shall file a copy of the decision of the county judge/executive with the circuit clerk and shall execute a bond guaranteeing the payment of the cost of the appeal. The cost of the appeal shall be adjudged against the person losing the appeal.

The county attorney shall resist any appeal filed by an applicant and shall represent the county judge/executive granting a permit in any court proceedings.

History.

1599f-15: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 213, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 366, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 369, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

231.100.
County judge/executive to fix hours of operation.

The county judge/executive shall, by an order entered in his order book, fix reasonable hours of operation for places of entertainment throughout the county.

History.

1599f-8: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 367, effective June 17, 1978.

231.110.
Conduct prohibited on premises.

No person who has been granted a permit shall allow:

Drunken, disorderly, or boisterous persons, or persons of lewd or lascivious reputation to congregate in or about the premises;

People to congregate there for immoral or unlawful purposes or to permit any man or woman who are not married to each other to occupy any cabin, cottage, or secreted room or place from which the view of the public is excluded;

The premises to be used as a place of assemblage or entertainment at later hours than those which are stated in the permit or recorded on the order book of the county judge/executive;

Engaging in fortune-telling at any location except that specifically stated in his permit;

Engaging in fortune-telling without first posting in a conspicuous place, both inside and outside the premises at which he is authorized to engage in fortune-telling, and without first filing with the county clerk of the county in which the premises are located, a schedule showing in detail the fees charged for readings, predictions, and services of any nature.

History.

1599f-9: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 175, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 368, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a private club does not offer alcoholic beverages for sale, nor engage in any described activities under KRS

231.010

, no permit is required; however, if a private club offers alcoholic beverages for sale in a county in which such sales are legal, subdivision (1) of this section would prohibit the permit holder from allowing drunken, disorderly or boisterous persons, etc., from congregating in or about such premises.

OAG 84-185

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Unlicensed place of business, permitting drinking, giving or selling intoxicants at, prohibited, KRS

243.020

.

231.120.
Forfeiture of permit for violation of chapter.

Upon the conviction of the owner or manager of a place of entertainment for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter:

The judgment of the court shall provide for the forfeiture of the permit;

A copy of the judgment shall be certified by the court in which the conviction occurs to the county clerk and shall be recorded by him in the order book of the county judge/executive; and

The permit shall then be canceled and become void.

History.

1599f-10: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 369, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If the person receiving an entertainment permit is charged with and convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter, including other applicable criminal law, the judgment of the court of jurisdiction shall provide for the forfeiture of the permit; in such cases, the permit becomes canceled and void.

OAG 84-100

.

231.125.
Forfeiture for violation of alcoholic beverage control laws.

The conviction of the owner or manager of a place of entertainment for violation of the alcohol beverage control laws may be an additional ground for revocation and forfeiture of the place of entertainment permit by the county judge/executive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 175, § 3, effective June 17, 1954; 1978, ch. 384, § 370, effective June 17, 1978.

231.130.
Peace officers to visit.

The sheriff, deputy sheriff and county patrolmen of each county shall visit places of entertainment regularly. Upon their observing any violation of this chapter, by the owner or manager, they shall make arrests without warrants for violations committed within their presence.

History.

1599f-13.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A police officer may, if necessary in the discharge of his duty, use reasonable force to gain access to the public areas of licensed taverns during the hours of licensed operation.

OAG 67-65

.

A police officer of a city of the second class, acting in accordance with his general duties to preserve the peace, may take steps to secure a clear view of the entire premises of an establishment operating under license to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink.

OAG 67-65

.

While a sheriff and his deputies have authority to enter places of entertainment, which does not exclude special private clubs, city police officers have no authority to enter a licensed private club without a valid search or arrest warrant.

OAG 74-153

.

Police officers of a third class city have no authority to enter upon the private premises of a private social club for the purpose of observation.

OAG 74-313

.

A sheriff is not authorized to visit public places within the county pursuant to this section unless they are located outside the corporate limits of the city.

OAG 74-409

.

A Kentucky state trooper has the authority to investigate places of entertainment as defined by KRS

231.010

, even though state troopers are not specifically included under this section, since this section and KRS

16.060

read together make the state trooper a police officer with the equivalent authority of the county sheriff and the county police.

OAG 81-77

.

Sheriff and his staff (as well as county policemen) can periodically visit “places of entertainment,” operating under a permit from the county judge/executive, without having a search warrant and may enter a place of entertainment without such warrant in order to determine whether the owner or manager has a permit for the operation, assuming the sheriff has reasonable cause to believe that it is being operated as a place of entertainment.

OAG 84-185

.

Assuming that a place of entertainment is operating under a known permit or that the sheriff has reasonable cause to suspect that it is a place of entertainment, as defined by statute, the sheriff or his deputies may use reasonable force in effecting an entrance to such place of entertainment pursuant to this section.

OAG 84-185

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Warrant, proceedings if arrest made without, RCr 3.02.

Warrant, when peace officer may arrest without, KRS

431.005

.

231.160.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

231.170.
Booking agents to be licensed — Fees — Bond — Penalty, forfeiture of bond. [Repealed.]

231.180.
Showing “X” or “R” rated movies in certain previews prohibited.

No movie theater, drive-in theater, or other facility requiring a fee for admission shall show a “X” or “R” rated movie in their previews if a “G” or “GP” movie is playing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 12, § 1(1).

231.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

231.020

shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or confined in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or both. Each day that a place of entertainment is operated without a permit shall be a separate offense.

Except as provided in subsection (1), any owner or manager of a place of entertainment who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not more than three hundred dollars ($300) or confined in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

231.180

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) per violation. Each showing shall be considered as a separate violation.

History.

1599f-11, 1599f-12: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 12, § 1(2).